Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.170

Authority of family court judges and court commissioners to order or recommend services—Report by court of child abuse or neglect.

To facilitate and promote the purposes of this chapter, family court judges and court commissioners may order or recommend family court services, parenting seminars, drug and alcohol abuse evaluations and monitoring of the parties through public or private treatment services, other treatment services, the aid of physicians, psychiatrists, other specialists, or other services or may recommend the aid of the pastor or director of any religious denomination to which the parties may belong.

If the court has reasonable cause to believe that a child of the parties has suffered abuse or neglect it may file a report with the proper law enforcement agency or the department of social and health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040. Upon receipt of such a report the law enforcement agency or the department of social and health services will conduct an investigation into the cause and extent of the abuse or neglect. The findings of the investigation may be made available to the court if ordered by the court as provided in RCW 42.56.210(2). The findings shall be restricted to the issue of abuse and neglect and shall not be considered custody investigations.

[ 2005 c 274 s 241; 1994 c 267 s 3; 1991 c 367 s 13; 1983 c 219 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 151 s 2; 1949 c 50 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-46.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 267: See note following RCW 26.09.191.

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.